Utah statutes.
48-3a-1104.   Name limitations.

(1)  The name of a domestic professional services company and of a foreign professional services company authorized to transact business in this state, in addition to complying with Sections 48-3a-108 and 48-3a-906:

(a)  may not contain language stating or implying that it is formed for a purpose other than that authorized by:

(i)  its certificate of organization; or

(ii)  Section 48-3a-1106;

(b)  must conform with any rule made by the regulating board having jurisdiction over a professional service described in the professional services company's certificate of organization; and

(c)  in lieu of the requirement of Subsection 48-3a-108(1), must contain the words "professional limited liability company" or the abbreviations "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC" in:

(i)  its certificate of organization; and

(ii)  a report or document filed with the division.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(c), a professional services company may hold itself out to the public under a name that does not contain the words "professional limited liability company" or the abbreviations "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC" if that name complies with Subsection 48-3a-108(1).

(3)  Sections 48-3a-108 and 48-3a-906 do not prevent the use of a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if the name is:

(a)  the personal name of an individual member or individual former member of the professional services company; or

(b)  the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of the professional services company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

